South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3123.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 15-77-300(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) The provisions of this section do not apply to civil actions relating to the establishment of public utility rates, disciplinary actions by state licensing boards, habeas corpus or post conviction post-conviction relief actions, and child support actions, except as otherwise provided for herein, and child abuse and neglect actions in this section. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----